Maryland, session 2026, SB0811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
10–804.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE” MEANS A DATABASE
USED BY REAL ESTATE PROFESSIONALS TO FACILITATE THE SALE OF REAL
PROPERTY, INCLUDING USE IN THE PREPARATION OF MARKET EVALUATIONS AND
APPRAISALS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0811*

SENATE BILL 811
(B) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SALE OF A NEW HOME IN THE STATE, A
DEVELOPER, BUILDER, BROKER, OR REAL ESTATE AGENT SHALL ENTER THE FINAL
SALE PRICE OF THE NEW HOME INTO A MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE OR SIMILARLY
ACCESSIBLE DATABASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.